Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202020-170
Mother; right to breast-feed child; school; provide facilities or accommodation for milk expression and storage.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a mother may breast-feed her child in any public or private location where the mother is otherwise authorized to be, including, but not limited to, a mother who is attending a public, private, denominational, or parochial day school which meets the requirements for legal operation prescribed in Chapter 79. For a mother who is attending a public, private, denominational, or parochial day school which meets the requirement for legal operation prescribed in Chapter 79, the school shall also provide for private or appropriate facilities or accommodation for milk expression and storage. Nothing in this section limits the authority of administrative and teaching personnel to regulate student behavior as provided by section 79-258 or the authority of a private, denominational, or parochial school to regulate student behavior in order to further school purposes or to prevent interference with the educational process.

Laws 2011, LB197, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB427, § 5.